California statutes. Business and Professions Code
No amateur boxing contest shall be held in conjunction with vaudeville shows, dances, or entertainments of any sort.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Martial Arts [18760. - 18770.]

18760.

Except as otherwise provided by this article, “boxing” as used in this chapter includes “kickboxing” and “martial arts.” Sections 18720, 18721, 18723, 18725, 18728, 18755, and 18756, and Article 15 (commencing with Section 18870) shall not apply to kickboxing and martial arts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1095, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

18761.

Rules and regulations of the commission relating to professional boxing shall apply to kickboxing and martial arts, except where specifically excluded by the commission’s regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18763.

The commission shall by rule and regulation, regulate kickboxing and martial arts in accordance with Section 18640.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18765.

The commission shall, by rule and regulation, prescribe the length and duration of professional and amateur kickboxing and martial arts contests, the weight classifications, the manner in which the contestants engage in such contests, and such further safeguards and conditions as shall insure fair, sportsmanlike, and scientific contests.

No contest shall be conducted unless each contestant uses protective gear approved by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18766.

Every contestant in an amateur kickboxing or martial arts contest under the age of 18 years shall wear protective headgear approved by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18767.

This chapter shall not apply to light and noncontact kickboxing and martial arts, and kickboxing and martial arts instruction and schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18768.

The commission shall not function as a sanctioning body, nor shall it grant titles to fighters or to individual events. This function shall be retained by such professional and amateur full-contact kickboxing and martial arts associations operating on a local, statewide, regional, national or international level, which shall, when operating in California, observe such rules and regulations adopted by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18769.

(a) The commission may appoint an advisory committee to advise the commission on the provisions of this article.

(b) The advisory committee shall be composed of individuals, residing in California, who have prior to their appointment, been promoters, fighters, trainers, managers, or officials in publicly held kickboxing or full-contact martial arts events.

(c) The advisory committee may elect its own officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18770.

(a) (1) The commission shall establish an advisory pankration subcommittee to investigate the rules and conduct of contests involving or claiming to involve pankration by persons under 18 years of age, or any style deemed by the subcommittee to be sufficiently similar thereto.

(2) The pankration subcommittee shall consist of three members of the commission.

(b) The subcommittee shall meet and examine the following matters, including, but not limited to:

(1) In general, the legality and safety of the contests described in
 subdivision (a).

(2) Whether or not legislation should be enacted to impose age-based requirements or restrictions, which may include a prohibition on participants engaging in the contests described in subdivision (a).

(3) Appropriate safety precautions for persons under 18 years of age engaging in the contests described in subdivision (a).

(c) By July 1, 2014, the subcommittee shall make recommendations to the commission regarding any
 legislative changes to be enacted that may be necessary to improve the commission’s regulation and oversight of the contests described in subdivision (a) in order to adequately protect participants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 506, Sec. 5.   (AB 1186)   Effective October 3, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Revenue and Fiscal Affairs [18800. - 18828.]

18800.

As of July 1, 2004, all moneys received by the commission under this chapter shall be accounted for and reported by detailed statements furnished by the commission to the Controller at least once a month. At the same time, these moneys, other than those that have been received by the commission pursuant to Section 18882, shall be remitted to the Treasurer and shall be deposited in the Athletic Commission Fund, which is hereby created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 227, Sec. 3.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

18801.

The salaries and expenses of the members and employees, and the operating expenses of the commission shall be paid by the Treasurer on the warrant of the Controller from the funds appropriated therefor upon the certification of the executive officer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18802.

The commission is, with respect to accounting, auditing, budget, financial and personal matters, subject to all laws and requirements now or hereafter imposed by law upon, or applicable to state agencies.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18804.

The application and renewal fee for a license to promote or conduct a professional contest or exhibition shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1057, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

18805.

The application and renewal fee for a license to promote or conduct amateur boxing contests shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1057, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

18806.

The application and renewal fee for a boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts matchmaker’s license shall be two hundred dollars ($200).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1057, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

18807.

The application and renewal fee for a boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts assistant matchmaker’s license shall be two hundred dollars ($200).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1057, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

18808.

The application and renewal fee for a booking agent’s license shall be two hundred dollars ($200).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1057, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

18809.

The application and renewal fee for a professional boxer, kickboxer, or martial arts fighter license shall be sixty dollars ($60).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1057, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

18810.

The application and renewal fee for a boxing, kickboxing, and martial arts manager’s license shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1057, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

18811.

The application and renewal fee for a boxing, kickboxing, and martial arts trainer’s license, chief second’s and second’s license shall be fifty dollars ($50).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1057, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

18812.

The application and renewal fee for a professional boxing, kickboxing, and martial arts referee’s or judge’s license shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1057, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

18813.

The application and renewal fee for an amateur boxing, kickboxing, and martial arts referee’s and judge’s license shall be seventy-five dollars ($75).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1057, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

18814.

The application and renewal fee for a timekeeper’s license shall be fifty dollars ($50) unless the commission establishes a lower fee by regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1137, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18815.

The application and renewal fee for a sparring permit shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1057, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

18816.

The application and renewal fee for a licensed professional trainer, as described in Section 18653, shall be two hundred dollars ($200).

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 370, Sec. 14.   (SB 309)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

18819.

The fee for a simultaneous telecast permit under Section 18831 shall be fifty dollars ($50) per event.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1057, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

18820.

The commission shall charge a twenty-dollar ($20) fee to issue federal identification cards. Cards shall be reissued once every four years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 370, Sec. 16.   (SB 309)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

18822.

(a) For licenses issued before January 1, 2007, a license may be renewed at any time prior to midnight on December 31 of the year in which it was issued. If not renewed, the license shall expire at that time.

(b) A license issued on or after January 1, 2007, shall expire 12 months after issuance, on the last day of the 12th month. To renew an unexpired license, the licenseholder shall, on or before midnight of the day on which the license would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the commission and pay the prescribed renewal fee. If the licenseholder is a boxer or martial arts contestant, the renewal application shall also be accompanied by the required medical examinations and test results. Renewal of an unexpired license shall continue the license in effect for one year from the expiration date of the license, when it shall again expire if it is not renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 465, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18824.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 18646 and 18832, every person who conducts a contest or wrestling exhibition shall, within 72 hours after the determination of every contest or wrestling exhibition that admission is charged and received, furnish to the commission the following:

(1) A written report executed under penalty of perjury by one of the officers, showing the amount of the gross receipts, not to exceed four million dollars ($4,000,000), and the gross price for the contest or wrestling exhibition charged directly or indirectly and no matter by whom received, for the sale, lease, or other exploitation of broadcasting and television rights of the contest or wrestling exhibition, and without any deductions, except for expenses incurred for one broadcast
 announcer, telephone line connection, and transmission mobile equipment facility, which may be deducted from the gross taxable base when those expenses are approved by the commission.

(2) A fee of 5 percent, exclusive of any federal taxes paid thereon, of the amount paid for admission to the contest or wrestling exhibition, except that for any one contest, the fee shall not exceed the amount of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000). The commission shall report to the Legislature on the fiscal impact of the two-hundred-thousand-dollar ($200,000) limit on fees collected by the commission for admissions revenues during its next sunset review.

(A) The amount of the gross receipts upon which the fee provided for in this paragraph is calculated shall not include any assessments levied by the commission under Section 18711.

(B) If the fee for any one boxing contest exceeds seventy thousand dollars ($70,000), the amount in excess of seventy thousand dollars ($70,000) shall be paid one-half to the commission and one-half to the Boxers’ Pension Fund.

(C) The fee shall apply to the amount actually paid for admission and not to the regular established price.

(D) A fee is not due in the case of a person admitted free of charge. However, if the total number of persons admitted free of charge to a boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts contest, or wrestling exhibition exceeds 33 percent of the total number of spectators, then a fee of one dollar ($1) per complimentary ticket or pass used to gain
 admission to the contest shall be paid to the commission for each complimentary ticket or pass that exceeds the numerical total of 33 percent of the total number of spectators.

(E) The minimum fee for an amateur contest or exhibition shall not be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000). The minimum fee for a professional contest or exhibition shall not be less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(3) A fee of up to 5 percent, to be established by the commission through regulations to become operative on or before July 1, 2008, and updated periodically as needed, of the gross price, exclusive of any federal taxes paid thereon, for the sale, lease, or other exploitation of broadcasting or television rights thereof, except that in no case shall the fee be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(b) As used in this section, “person” includes a promoter, club, individual, corporation, partnership, association, or other organization, and “wrestling exhibition” means a performance of wrestling skills and techniques by two or more individuals, that admission is charged or is broadcast or televised, the participating individuals are not required to use their best efforts in order to win, and the winner may have been selected before the performance commences.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 84, Sec. 1.   (SB 172)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18825.

An inspector or other representative of the commission duly authorized by the executive officer shall be admitted to the box office, and is authorized to assist in the counting of tickets and in the computation of the tax due thereon, and to take any other action necessary for the administration and enforcement of this chapter. The inspector or other representative shall immediately transmit to the commission the official statement of gross receipts received by him or her from the promoter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 370, Sec. 18.   (SB 309)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

18826.

Whenever any promoter fails to make a report of any contest or wrestling exhibition within the period prescribed by this chapter, or whenever such report is unsatisfactory to the commission, the executive officer, or his or her duly authorized representative may examine, or cause to be examined, the books and records of the promoter and any other persons or organizations, and subpoena and examine under oath, such persons for the purpose of determining the total amount of the gross receipts for any contest or wrestling exhibition and the amount of tax due pursuant to this chapter, which tax he or she may fix and determine as a result of such examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18827.

If a promoter fails to pay any tax ascertained to be due under this chapter, in addition to the costs of the examination under Section 18826, if any, within 30 days after receipt of notice by the executive officer, the commission may without hearing revoke or suspend the promoter’s license and authorize the Attorney General to bring an action in superior court to collect the amount due, any fines authorized by this chapter, and attorney’s fees.

The action shall be speedily determined by the court and shall take precedence over all matters pending therein except criminal cases, applications for injunction or other matters to which special precedence has been given by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1095, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

18828.

(a) The commission may enter into a contract to sanction, supervise, or provide other services for contests under this chapter for which the fees under this chapter do not apply only if the contract provides for a payment to the commission for reasonable and necessary services provided under the contract.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that payment under subdivision (a) shall include the following:

(1) Consideration of costs incurred by the commission.

(2) A contribution into the Boxers’ Pension Fund of not less than 20 percent of the commission’s costs under paragraph (1).

(3) A contribution into the State Athletic Commission Neurological Examination Account of not less than 20 percent of the commission’s costs under paragraph (1).

(c) A contestant’s participation in a contest subject to this section shall be deemed to be a commission-approved contest for purposes of participation in the Boxers’ Pension Plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 465, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Closed Circuit Telecast Revenue [18830. - 18837.]

18830.

As used in this article:

(a) “Person” includes a promoter, club, individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, association, or other organization.

(b) “Closed circuit telecast” includes any telecast or broadcast, transmitted by any means, including subscription where an extra or additional fee is charged or where an identifiable or particular fee is charged for the viewing within this state of a simultaneous telecast of any live, current, or spontaneous match or wrestling exhibition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18831.

No person shall charge or receive an admission fee for exhibiting a simultaneous telecast of any live, current, or spontaneous contest or wrestling exhibition on a closed-circuit telecast viewed within this state without a permit issued by the commission.

Application for such a permit shall be on a form provided by the commission, shall include a bond as required in Article 5, and shall contain such information as the commission may require, including, but not limited to, the locations where such telecasts are to be viewed. A permit shall be issued for each location where such telecast is to be viewed. The applicant shall pay the permit fee required in Section 18819.

The bond shall guarantee payment of taxes and fines due and payable to the state.

The permit may be denied only for the following reasons:

(a) The information required by the commission is not supplied by the applicant.

(b) The applicant is or has been in default for the payment of any taxes or fees required by this chapter.

(c) The permit fee has not been paid by the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18832.

Every person who charges and receives a fee for exhibiting a simultaneous telecast of any live, current, or spontaneous contest or wrestling exhibition on a closed-circuit telecast viewed within this state shall, within 72 hours after such event, furnish to the commission, a written report under penalty of perjury on a form which shall be provided by the commission showing the number of tickets or subscriptions where an extra or additional fee is charged for the viewing, which were issued or sold, and the gross receipts therefor without any deductions whatsoever. The person shall also, at the same time, pay to the commission a 5 percent tax, exclusive of federal taxes thereon, of the amount paid for admission or subscription telecast, as defined in Section 18830, to the showing or viewing of the contest or wrestling exhibition. In no event, however, shall the tax be less than fifty dollars ($50). The tax shall apply uniformly to all persons subject to the tax.

The tax on admission shall apply to the amount actually paid for admission and not the regular established price.

No tax is due in the case of a person admitted free of charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18833.

The commission may designate a representative to be present at, and observe the computation of the number of tickets issued or sold, and the determination of the gross receipts. Where a telecast or broadcast is accomplished by subscription, records in support of the receipts shall be made available to the commission upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18834.

Whenever any person fails to make a report of a closed-circuit television showing of any contest or wrestling exhibition within the period prescribed by Section 18832, or whenever the report is unsatisfactory to the commission, the executive officer or his or her representative may examine or cause to be examined, the books and records of the permit holder or any other person, and subpoena and examine under oath those persons for the purposes of determining the total amount of the gross receipts of a closed-circuit television showing of any contest or wrestling exhibition and the amount of tax due pursuant to this chapter, which tax he or she may fix or determine as the result of the examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18835.

If a permitholder fails to pay any tax ascertained to be due under this chapter, in addition to the costs of the examination under Section 18834, if any, within 30 days after receipt of notice by the executive officer, the commission may authorize the Attorney General to bring an action in superior court to collect the amount due, any fines authorized by this chapter and attorney’s fees.

The action shall be speedily determined by the court and shall take precedence over all matters pending therein except criminal cases, applications for injunction, or other matters to which special precedence has been given by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1095, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

18836.

In case of default in the payment of any tax due under this chapter, the commission may refuse to issue a permit to any person so defaulting regardless of whether the application for the permit is made solely in the name of the person, or together with others.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18837.

This article does not apply to a cable television’s system franchised under Section 53066 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Administrative Enforcement [18840. - 18860.]

18840.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, if in the judgment of the commission the financial responsibility, experience, character and general fitness of an applicant for a license or renewal thereof, or any person connected with the applicant, are such that the participation of the applicant will be consistent with the public interest, convenience or necessity, and with the best interests of boxing and martial arts generally, and in conformity with the purposes of this chapter, and the rules or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, the commission may grant an unrestricted license or issue a license subject to terms and conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 757, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

18841.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, licenses issued under this chapter may be revoked, suspended, or placed on probation under terms and conditions including, but not limited to, the making of restitution, for any violation or attempted violation of this chapter, any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, or for any cause for which a license may be denied.

Such action shall be final, except that the propriety of such action is subject to review, upon questions of law only, by the superior court. The action of the commission shall stand unless and until reversed by the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18842.

The commission, the executive officer and other employees duly authorized by the executive officer, shall have the power to suspend temporarily, any license until final determination by the commission when, in his or her opinion, the action is necessary to protect the public welfare or is in the best interest of boxing or martial arts.

The suspension may be without advance hearing, but the suspended licensee may apply to the commission for a hearing on the matter to determine if the suspension should be modified or set aside. The application for a hearing shall be in writing and shall be received by the commission within 30 days after the date of suspension. Upon receipt of such written request, the commission shall set the matter for hearing within 30 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 757, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

18843.

(a) In addition to its authority under other provisions of this chapter to take action against a licensee, the commission, its executive officer, or his or her duly authorized representative shall have the authority to assess fines not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or any of the rules and regulations of the commission.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision, the commission may also assess a fine of up to 40 percent of the total purse for a violation of Section 18649 related to the use of prohibited substances.

(c) Fines may be assessed
 without advance hearing, but the licensee may apply to the commission for a hearing on the matter if the fine should be modified or set aside. This application for a hearing shall be in writing and shall be received by the commission within 30 days after service of notice of the fine. Upon receipt of this written request, the commission shall set the matter for hearing within 30 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 316, Sec. 5.   (SB 469)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18844.

If a licensee fails to pay any fine assessed under this chapter within 30 days after receipt of notice by the executive officer, after time for appeal has passed or after action on an appeal by the commission, the commission may, without hearing, revoke or suspend the license held by the licensee and authorize the Attorney General to bring an action in superior court to collect the amount due and attorney’s fees.

The action shall be speedily determined by the court and shall take precedence over all matters pending therein except criminal cases, applications for injunction, or other matters to which special precedence has been given by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18845.

(a) The commission, its executive officer, or any other employee duly authorized by the executive officer may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses, giving of testimony, or the production of documents before the commission, any member thereof, the executive officer, or any other duly authorized employee with the same effect as if they were issued in an action in the superior court. They may also administer oaths in all matters appertaining to their duties or connected with the administration of the affairs of the commission.

(b) No witness shall be obliged to attend at a place out of the county in which the witness resides unless the distance is less than 150 miles from the witness’s residence, except the commission
 or its designee may endorse on a subpoena an order requiring the attendance of such witness upon a showing that the testimony of such witness is material and necessary.

(c) Disobedience of a subpoena may be punished as a contempt by the superior court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 486, Sec. 7.   (SB 1456)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18846.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission, its executive officer, or his or her duly authorized representative may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses or the production or examination of documents before the commission, any member thereof, its executive officer, or his or her duly authorized representative. The subpoenas shall have the same effect as if they were issued in an action in superior court. The persons may also administer oaths, in all matters appertaining to their duties, the enforcement of this chapter, or otherwise connected with the administration of the affairs of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18847.

The disobedience of a subpoena issued under Section 18846 shall be attended by the same consequences and subject to the same penalties as if such disobedience occurred in an action in the superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18848.

The license of any promoter or matchmaker found guilty of managing a boxer or martial arts fighter, either directly or indirectly, without written approval from the commission shall be subject to disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 757, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

18849.

No promoter, nor any person having a proprietary interest in the promoter, shall have, either directly or indirectly, any proprietary interest in a boxer or martial arts fighter competing on the premises owned, leased, or rented by the promoter without written approval from the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 757, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

18850.

(a) Any boxer or martial arts fighter who participates in a contest or match while under suspension by the commission, or any other recognized commission, shall have his or her license revoked.

(b) Any licensee who, directly or indirectly, aids or abets a boxer or martial arts fighter in violation of this section shall be subject to disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 757, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

18851.

A manager of a boxer or martial arts fighter shall maintain an accurate annual record showing all of the following with respect to each contest in which the boxer or martial arts fighter has participated:

(a) Training expenses.

(b) Amount of money actually paid to the contestant.

(c) Amount of money which the manager received from the purse.

(d) Amount of money owed to the manager by the contestant.

The manager’s record shall be supported by documentation, shall be made
 available to both the fighter under contract and the commission upon request, and shall be kept in the manager’s possession for a period of five years from the transaction.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18852 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 316, Sec. 6.   (SB 469)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18852.

No fighter shall be paid before a contest, except that a promoter may, with the written approval of the commission, advance to the fighter before the contest, up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) plus any necessary transportation and living expenses. However, such advance, except necessary transportation and living expenses, shall not exceed 20 percent of the fighter’s purse.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18853 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 316, Sec. 7.   (SB 469)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18853.

No fighter, nor his or her manager, shall be paid for the services of the fighter except in the presence of an authorized commission representative. The commission representative shall report to the executive officer any payment made contrary to the provisions of the contract on file with the commission.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18854 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 316, Sec. 8.   (SB 469)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18854.

Any official who fails to enforce the provisions of this act or the commission’s rules and regulations shall be subject to disciplinary action.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18855 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 316, Sec. 9.   (SB 469)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18855.

The commission shall recognize and enforce contracts between boxers or martial arts fighters and managers and between boxers or martial arts fighters and licensed clubs. Contracts shall be executed on printed forms approved by the commission. The commission may recognize or enforce a contract not on its printed form if entered into in another jurisdiction. No other contract or agreement may be recognized or enforced by the commission. All disputes between the parties to the contract, including the validity of the contract, shall be arbitrated by the commission pursuant to the provisions of the contract. Subject to Section 227 of Title 4 of the California Code of Regulations, a person who seeks arbitration of a contract shall send a written request to the commission’s headquarters and to
 the office of the Attorney General. The commission may seek cost recovery related to arbitration proceedings from the parties subject to the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 316, Sec. 10.   (SB 469)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18856.

(a) The commission, the executive officer, or authorized representative shall have power to order a promoter to withhold any purse, any part thereof, any receipts or other funds owing or payable to any contestant, or the share thereof of any manager, if, in his or her judgment, it should appear that the contestant is not competing honestly, or is intentionally not competing to the best of his or her ability, or if it should appear that the contestant, manager, or any seconds have violated any provision of this act, or the rules and regulations adopted by the commission.

(b) Any purse, or portion thereof, so withheld, shall be delivered by the promoter to the commission upon demand.
 Any contestant claiming the money withheld shall within 10 days after the end of the contest apply in writing to the commission for a hearing, the commission shall fix a date for the hearing, and after the hearing determines the disposition to be made of the money held by the commission.

(c) If no application for a hearing is filed within the time prescribed the commission shall meet and determine the disposition to be made of the money held by the commission.

(d) This section does not apply to any exhibition where the participants are not competing to the best of their ability.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18860 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 316, Sec. 11.   (SB 469)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18857.

The commission, the executive officer, or authorized representative shall have the power to order a promoter to withhold 10 percent of the total purse payable to a contestant if the manager of the contestant does not present an itemized statement of expenses incurred in connection with the contest. The money so withheld shall be paid to the commission and held in trust for payment to the contestant or his or her manager, upon presentation by the manager to the commission of the itemized statement of expenses.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18861 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 316, Sec. 12.   (SB 469)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18858.

Any licensee who directly or indirectly holds, participates in, aids, or abets any sham or fake contest or match shall be subject to disciplinary action.

This section does not apply to any exhibition.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18865 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 316, Sec. 13.   (SB 469)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18859.

(a) The commission shall have the authority to obtain and review criminal history information to determine whether an applicant or licensee has been convicted of any offense or has been arrested for any offense for which disposition is still pending. A conviction, or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to an offense, may be cause to deny an application or take disciplinary action against a licensee dependent on the relevancy of the offense to the licensed activity.

(b) The commission may require applicants to submit two sets of fingerprints which shall be furnished to the Department of Justice. Upon the request of the commission, the Department of Justice shall submit one set of the
 fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to obtain a copy of the Federal Bureau of Investigation’s record and shall retain one set to search the California criminal history system.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18868 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 316, Sec. 14.   (SB 469)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18860.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent any county, city, or city and county from prohibiting the holding or participating in any contest, match, or exhibition.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18869 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 316, Sec. 15.   (SB 469)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Crimes and Penalties [18870. - 18878.]

18870.

Any person or promoter to whom this chapter applies who directly or indirectly holds, aids or abets, or attempts to hold, aid or abet the holding of, any contest, match or exhibition without first having obtained a license or permit therefor under this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1095, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

18871.

Any contestant who continues to participate in a professional or amateur contest or match after an order to stop the contest is given by an official, or authorized representative of the commission, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18872.

Any promoter who directly or indirectly destroys, or aids and abets in the destruction of, any ticket or ticket stub to a contest, match, or exhibition within six months after the event without written authorization from the commission is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18873.

Any person who throws any object at the ring during a contest, match, or exhibition is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)